Delaware, session 153, HB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part II, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4108. Child Abuse Pension Attachment. (a) When a person receives or will be entitled to receive a pension under Chapter 88 of Title 11 or Chapter 53, 55, 55A, or 56 of Title 29, and is convicted of a qualifying offense, the Court may, in its discretion, direct that the pension is assignable to the victim of the offense as set forth in this section upon a finding by a preponderance of the evidence that the offense was committed in connection with or was aided by the position of the offender that entitled the offender to the pension. âQualifying offenseâ for the purposes of this section means a sexual offense as defined in Â§ 761(i) of this title committed against a child. (b) The Court may assign the pension as follows: (1) Where the qualifying offense is a misdemeanor, assign up to 25% of each pension distribution up to the limit of the total restitution owed, until satisfied. (2) Where the qualifying offense is a felony, assign up to 50% of each pension distribution up to the limit of the total restitution owed, until satisfied. (c) The Board of Pension Trustees must make regulations to implement court orders under this section. Section 2. Amend Part V, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8803. Garnishment and assignment of benefits prohibited. Except for orders of the Delaware Family Court for a sum certain payable on a periodic basis, basis and under Â§ 4108 of Title 11, the benefits provided by this chapter shall not be subject to attachment or execution and shall be payable only to the beneficiary designated and shall not be subject to assignment or transfer. Section 3. Amend Chapter 51, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5127. Denial of benefits to employees convicted of certain crimes. (a) A person who would otherwise be eligible to receive a service or disability pension as provided in Chapter 88 of Title 11 or Chapter 53, 55, 55A, or 56 of Title 29 is not entitled or permitted to receive the stateâs contribution to the pension, but is entitled or permitted to receive the personâs own contribution to the pension, following the Executive Secretaryâs receipt of a written notification from the personâs employer (or former employer) certifying all of the following: (1) The person has been convicted of a sexual offense as defined in Â§ 761(i) of this title committed against a child or equivalent offense in another state. (2) The conviction was based on acts committed in connection with or aided by the offenderâs position. (3) The conviction occurred after [the effective date of this Act]. (b) The survivor of any person denied a pension under this section is entitled to receive the survivor benefits described in this chapter following the death of such person, provided the person has not received the withdrawal benefit provided by Â§ 5530 of this title. Section 4. Amend Â§ 5304, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5304. Attachment and assignment of benefits. Except for orders of the Delaware Family Court for a sum certain payable on a periodic basis, basis and under Â§ 4108 of Title 11, the benefits provided by this chapter shall not be subject to attachment or execution and shall be payable only to the beneficiary designated and shall not be subject to assignment or transfer. Section 5. Amend Â§ 5503, Chapter 55, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5503. Attachment and assignment of benefits. Except for orders of the Delaware Family Court for a sum certain payable on a periodic basis basis, under Â§ 4108 of Title 11, or for benefits payable under Â§â5546 of this title, the benefits provided by this chapter shall not be subject to attachment or execution and shall be payable only to the beneficiary designated and shall not be subject to assignment or transfer. Section 6. Amend Â§ 5553, Chapter 55A, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5553. Attachment and assignment of benefits. Except for orders of the Delaware Family Court for a sum certain payable on a periodic basis, basis and under Â§ 4108 of Title 11, the benefits provided by this chapter shall not be subject to attachment or execution and shall be payable only to the beneficiary designated and shall not be subject to assignment or transfer. Section 7. Amend Â§ 5620, Chapter 56, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions a shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 5620. Attachment and assign of benefits. Except for orders of the Delaware Family Court for a sum certain payable on a periodic basis, basis and under Â§ 4108 of Title 11, the benefits provided by this chapter shall not be subject to attachment or execution and shall be payable only to the beneficiary designated and shall not be subject to assignment or transfer.